Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1719.01
Collection of taxes, personal; sheriff; report.

On or before August 1 of each year, the sheriff shall report to the county board showing the total amount collected on current distress warrants and the amount remaining uncollected.

Laws 1943, c. 181, § 2, p. 628;

R.S.1943, § 77-1719;

Laws 1947, c. 259, § 2(2), p. 847;

Laws 1984, LB 835, § 14;

Laws 1998, LB 306, § 33.